dict/index.aff
SFX H Y 38
SFX H   úrgico          urgicamente     úrgico
SFX H   0               amente          dor
SFX H   ório            oriamente       ório
SFX H   ário            ariamente       ário
SFX H   ático           aticamente      ático
SFX H   ônico           onicamente      ônico
SFX H   ógico           ogicamente      ógico
SFX H   ífero           iferamente      ífero
SFX H   ético           eticamente      ético
SFX H   ístico          isticamente     ístico
SFX H   íssimo          issimamente     íssimo
SFX H   ítico           iticamente      ítico
SFX H   áfico           aficamente      áfico
SFX H   étrico          etricamente     étrico
SFX H   ômico           omicamente      ômico
SFX H   érico           ericamente      érico
SFX H   ótico           oticamente      ótico
SFX H   áceo            aceamente       áceo
SFX H   ástico          asticamente     ástico
SFX H   ício            iciamente       ício
SFX H   ífico           ificamente      ífico
SFX H   íaco            iacamente       íaco
SFX H   ólico           olicamente      ólico
SFX H   órico           oricamente      órico
SFX H   ênico           enicamente      ênico
SFX H   ódico           odicamente      ódico
SFX H   ópico           opicamente      ópico
SFX H   álico           alicamente      álico
SFX H   érmico          ermicamente     érmico
SFX H   ívoro           ivoramente      ívoro
SFX H   ábico           abicamente      ábico
SFX H   ófilo           ofilamente      ófilo
SFX H   élico           elicamente      élico
SFX H   êmico           emicamente      êmico
SFX H   ônio            oniamente       ônio
SFX H   ásico           asicamente      ásico
SFX H   ágico           agicamente      ágico
SFX H   ócil            ocilmente       ócil

SFX q Y 32
SFX q   ologia          ólogo           ologia
SFX q   ologia          óloga           ologia
SFX q   ologia          ólogos          ologia
SFX q   ologia          ólogas          ologia
SFX q   afia            áfico           afia
SFX q   afia            áfica           afia
SFX q   afia            áficos          afia
SFX q   afia            áficas          afia
SFX q   omania          ômano           omania
SFX q   omania          ômana           omania
SFX q   omania          ômanos          omania
SFX q   omania          ômanas          omania
SFX q   ofobia          ófobo           ofobia
SFX q   ofobia          ófoba           ofobia
SFX q   ofobia          ófobos          ofobia
SFX q   ofobia          ófobas          ofobia
SFX q   ofilia          ófilo           ofilia
SFX q   ofilia          ófila           ofilia
SFX q   ofilia          ófilos          ofilia
SFX q   ofilia          ófilas          ofilia
SFX q   ídio            ida             cídio
SFX q   ídio            idas            cídio
SFX q   ia              a               patia
SFX q   ia              as              patia
SFX q   ura             or              cultura
SFX q   ura             ora             cultura
SFX q   ura             ores            cultura
SFX q   ura             oras            cultura
SFX q   cia             ta              cracia
SFX q   cia             tas             cracia
SFX q   smo             sta             eísmo
SFX q   smo             stas            eísmo

SFX r Y 46
SFX r   ogia            ógico           logia
SFX r   ogia            ógica           logia
SFX r   ogia            ógicos          logia
SFX r   ogia            ógicas          logia
SFX r   ografia         ógrafo          ografia
SFX r   ografia         ógrafa          ografia
SFX r   ografia         ógrafos         ografia
SFX r   ografia         ógrafas         ografia
SFX r   omia            ômico           nomia
SFX r   omia            ômica           nomia
SFX r   omia            ômicos          nomia
SFX r   omia            ômicas          nomia
SFX r   ia              íaco            mania
SFX r   ia              íaca            mania
SFX r   ia              íacos           mania
SFX r   ia              íacas           mania
SFX r   acia            ático           cracia
SFX r   acia            ática           cracia
SFX r   acia            áticos          cracia
SFX r   acia            áticas          cracia
SFX r   icultura        ícola           icultura
SFX r   icultura        ícolas          icultura
SFX r   arquia          árquico         arquia
SFX r   arquia          árquica         arquia
SFX r   arquia          árquicos        arquia
SFX r   arquia          árquicas        arquia
SFX r   obia            óbico           fobia
SFX r   obia            óbica           fobia
SFX r   obia            óbicos          fobia
SFX r   obia            óbicas          fobia
SFX r   atia            ático           patia
SFX r   atia            ática           patia
SFX r   atia            áticos          patia
SFX r   atia            áticas          patia
SFX r   etria           étrico          metria
SFX r   etria           étrica          metria
SFX r   etria           étricos         metria
SFX r   etria           étricas         metria
SFX r   orfia           órfico          morfia
SFX r   orfia           órfica          morfia
SFX r   orfia           órficos         morfia
SFX r   orfia           órficas         morfia
SFX r   morfismo        mórfico         morfismo
SFX r   morfismo        mórfica         morfismo
SFX r   morfismo        mórficos        morfismo
SFX r   morfismo        mórficas        morfismo

SFX N Y 8
SFX N   r               díssimo         [ia]r
SFX N   r               díssima         [ia]r
SFX N   r               díssimas        [ia]r
SFX N   r               díssimos        [ia]r
SFX N   er              idíssimo        er
SFX N   er              idíssima        er
SFX N   er              idíssimas       er
SFX N   er              idíssimos       er

SFX W Y 12
SFX W   r               dinho           [ia]r
SFX W   r               dinha           [ia]r
SFX W   r               dinhas          [ia]r
SFX W   r               dinhos          [ia]r
SFX W   er              idinho          er
SFX W   er              idinha          er
SFX W   er              idinhas         er
SFX W   er              idinhos         er
SFX W   0               zinho           [^ã][eo]
SFX W   0               inho            l
SFX W   0               zinhos          [^ã][eo]
SFX W   0               inhos           l

SFX s Y 36
SFX s   o               íssimo          [^cçg]o
SFX s   co              quíssimo        co
SFX s   ço              císsimo         ço
SFX s   go              guíssimo        go
SFX s   e               íssimo          e
SFX s   0               íssimo          [lr]
SFX s   ês              esíssimo        ês
SFX s   z               císsimo         z
SFX s   ável            abilíssimo      ável
SFX s   o               íssima          [^cçg]o
SFX s   co              quíssima        co
SFX s   ço              císsima         ço
SFX s   go              guíssima        go
SFX s   e               íssima          e
SFX s   0               íssima          [lr]
SFX s   ês              esíssima        ês
SFX s   z               císsima         z
SFX s   ável            abilíssima      ável
SFX s   o               íssimos         [^cçg]o
SFX s   co              quíssimos       co
SFX s   ço              císsimos        ço
SFX s   go              guíssimos       go
SFX s   e               íssimos         e
SFX s   0               íssimos         [lr]
SFX s   ês              esíssimos       ês
SFX s   z               císsimos        z
SFX s   ável            abilíssimos     ável
SFX s   o               íssimas         [^cçg]o
SFX s   co              quíssimas       co
SFX s   ço              císsimas        ço
SFX s   go              guíssimas       go
SFX s   e               íssimas         e
SFX s   0               íssimas         [lr]
SFX s   ês              esíssimas       ês
SFX s   z               císsimas        z
SFX s   ável            abilíssimas     ável
